New Jersey, session 221, A4422.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  The governing board of each institution of higher education shall develop and adopt a policy on the use of campus facilities and grounds for camping.  The policy shall require any person or group seeking to camp at the institution to obtain prior approval from the institution. As used in this section, camping means the pitching of tents or the overnight use of sleeping bags, blankets, makeshift shelters, motor homes, campers, or camp trailers for any purpose. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.